Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.70.010

Waters within city—City's water supply.

Every code city shall have authority to protect waters within the city or comprising part of the city's water supply pursuant to the authority provided therefor by RCW 9.66.050, 54.16.050, 69.30.130, * 57.08.010, 8.12.030, 70.54.010 and 70.54.030.

[ 1996 c 230 s 1606; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.70.010.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 57.08.010 was repealed by 1996 c 230 s 1703, effective July 1, 1997. For later enactment, see RCW 57.08.005.

Part headings not law—Effective date—1996 c 230: See notes following RCW 57.02.001.